Maryland, session 2025, HB0315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force to Study Fiduciary Adjudication in Maryland.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) two members who are judges of an orphans’ court, at least one of whom
serves in a jurisdiction where orphans’ court judges are required to be attorneys, appointed
by the chair of the Conference of Orphans’ Court Judges;
(4) one nonvoting member who is a judge of the circuit court in a
jurisdiction where the circuit court sits as the orphans’ court, appointed by the Chief Justice
of the Supreme Court of Maryland;
(5) two members of the Maryland State Bar Association, designated by the
chair of the Estate and Trust Law Section Council, at least one of whom is who between
them shall include a fiduciary litigator and a resident of a jurisdiction with a population of
less than 250,000;

HOUSE BILL 315 3
(6) the chair two registers of wills designated by the president of the
Maryland Register of Wills Association; and
(7) one member with expertise in budgeting and personnel matters,
appointed by the Governor.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Task Force from among the
members appointed by the President of the Senate or the Speaker of the House.
(d) The Administrative Office of the Courts Department of Legislative Services in
conjunction with the Maryland State Bar Association shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) examine the qualifications, training, and methods of selection of judges
hearing probate and other fiduciary matters in Maryland;
(2) examine the jurisdictions of the orphans’ courts and circuit courts with
respect to fiduciary matters;
(3) analyze the efficiency of the procedures for adjudicating fiduciary
contested and uncontested matters in the orphans’ courts and circuit courts;
(4) analyze the effect of the different qualifications of orphans’ court judges
and related litigation procedures on the uniform application of justice in Maryland;
(5) analyze and compare the laws and practices of other states relating to
the adjudication of fiduciary matters, including the selection, qualification, and training of
judges hearing those matters;
(6) seek guidance from appropriate witnesses with experience or expertise
in the area of fiduciary adjudication;
(7) examine any other research, analysis, or guidance related to the best
practices for adjudicating fiduciary matters;
(8) offer one or more opportunities for members of the public and other
interested parties to give their opinions on the subjects considered by the Task Force; and

HOUSE BILL 315
(9) make recommendations to improve efficiency, uniformity, and quality
of fiduciary adjudication in Maryland.
(g) The orphans’ courts, circuit courts, registers of wills, and Administrative
Office of the Courts shall comply with all reasonable requests by the Task Force for
information and data the Task Force considers necessary for its work.
(h) On or before January 1, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.